Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 2. Capital Construction

§ 81.
Preliminary cost estimates.

The assistant judges of a county may authorize the preparation of preliminary plans and cost estimates for capital construction. For this purpose, the assistant judges may employ or retain architects, engineers, and such other personnel as in their discretion are required.

Upon completion of the preliminary plans and cost estimates authorized by subsection (a) of this section, the assistant judges shall determine the amount to be assessed against the equalized grand list of the county.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 82.
Submission to voters.

Debt may be incurred and bonds issued pursuant to the limitations of this chapter for the amount of funds necessary for capital construction.

Any bond issue pursuant to this chapter for capital construction shall be passed by a majority of the votes of those voting. The issue shall be submitted to the voters of the county at the first general or annual municipal election scheduled at least 90 days after the completion of the preliminary construction plans and cost estimates.

The assistant judges shall not submit to the voters more than twice the same proposition of incurring a bonded debt to pay for the cost of any particular capital construction project. If the first submission to the voters fails, the proposition may be resubmitted a second time at least 90 days but less than 180 days following the first submission.

Warnings of election, notification and conduct of meeting if required, and validation of bond issuance shall, insofar as applicable, be governed by the provisions of subchapter 1 of chapter 53 of this title relating to the issuance of municipal bonds.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 12; amended

2003, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 47, eff. June 8, 2004.

§ 83.
Form, denominations, certification, and cancellation of bonds.

Insofar as applicable, the provisions of subchapter 1 of chapter 53 of this title relating to the form, denominations, certification, cancellation, and other matters affecting the issuance of municipal bonds shall govern bonds issued pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 230

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.